Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 18 Livestock Board and State Veterinarian

Cross references. —

As to requiring legislature to provide for protection of livestock and stock owners, see art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 38 to 48; 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals § 1 et seq.; 78 Am. Jur. 2d Veterinarians § 1 et seq.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 15 to 19, 23; 3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 16 to 37, 66 to 116, 122 to 169, 274 to 348.

§ 11-18-101.
Livestock
board; creation; composition; qualifications; appointment and term
of members; removal; vacancies; name defined.

The Wyoming livestock board is created and shall consist of seven (7) livestock producers. At least three (3) members shall be sheep producers and at least three (3) shall be cattle producers, provided that if a vacancy exists on the board and no person meeting all the qualifications of this section is available then any livestock producer within the appointment district may be appointed. Members shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The members shall be appointed from each of the appointment districts pursuant to W.S.

9-1-218

and the appointment for each district shall be rotated among the counties within the district. The members shall serve for one (1) six (6) year term and until their successors are appointed and qualified. In case of a vacancy for any reason, the governor shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

. Each member of the Wyoming livestock board shall be a qualified elector of the county from which he is appointed and a resident of this state during his term of office.

The name, “Wyoming livestock and sanitary board” wherever it appears in any statute, law or regulation of record in this state or in any other document now in force and effect means “Wyoming livestock board.” All powers, duties and prerogatives having accrued by law to the former livestock and sanitary board is hereafter vested in the Wyoming livestock board.

Appointments and terms under this section shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 85, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 56-101; W.S. 1957, § 11-261; Laws 1961, ch. 228, § 1; 1973, ch. 61, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-21-103

; Laws 1977, ch. 21, § 2; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1983, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2006, ch. 92, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203.

Cross references. —

For definition of “qualified elector,” see § 22-1-102(a)(xxvi).

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), substituted “seven (7) livestock producers” for “three (3) woolgrowers and four (4) stockmen engaged in other livestock interests,” inserted the second sentence, and made a stylistic change.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (c), deleted “Effective July 1, 1979”at the beginning.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 92, § 2, appropriates from the general fund to the livestock board two hundred twenty-one thousand five hundred dollars ($221,500.00) for the biennium to fund the director position pursuant to this act and authorizes one (1) full-time equivalent position for the position of director authorized by this act.

Civil office. —

Members of livestock and sanitary board (now livestock board) hold civil office under the state, and hold their offices for six years and until their successors are appointed and have qualified. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Appointive power of governor. —

Governor's power of appointment without advice and consent of senate is confined to cases when vacancy exists and no other mode for filling it has been provided. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Mere fact that the term of office of a livestock and sanitary board (now livestock board) member did not expire until after adjournment of legislature did not prevent a prospective appointment followed by concurrence by the senate. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Right to hold over. —

Right to hold over until successor is appointed and qualifies is as much part of the tenure of office as the regular period fixed by statute. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Holding over keeps office filled. —

Under statute providing term of office shall be six years and “until successors are appointed and qualified,” no vacancy in office exists enabling governor to appoint successor without consent of senate while qualified person is in possession of office. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Death of incumbent holding over. —

Where governor's appointment after incumbent's term expired became valid on incumbent's death to extent incumbent had right to office until successor qualified, because senate did not confirm appointment, appointee's name or his successor's should go to senate at next session, and such person when confirmed will serve for balance of term. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Where governor's appointment of new member to livestock and sanitary board (now livestock board) was invalid because it was not confirmed by the senate, the death of a holdover member created a vacancy which the governor could fill by appointment, with the new appointee standing in the shoes of deceased. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Abandonment of offices not shown. —

Failure of incumbents to bring quo warranto until eight months after invalid appointments of new board members and after annual meeting, did not show loss of offices by “abandonment” or by “acquiescence.” People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Acquiescence in appointment of successor. —

Where former member of livestock and sanitary board (now livestock board) acquiesced in appointment of successor for more than two years, he lost all rights to office which he might otherwise have had as holdover incumbent. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Stated

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Peterson v. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n, 989 P.2d 113,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 11-18-102.
Livestock board; duties generally.

The Wyoming livestock
board shall exercise general supervision over and protect the livestock
interests of the state from theft and disease, and shall recommend
legislation as in its judgment will foster the industry.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 33, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 2031; C.S. 1910, § 2639; C.S. 1920, § 3136; R.S. 1931, § 67-115; C.S. 1945, § 56-115; W.S. 1957, § 11-262; W.S. 1977, §

11-21-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-18-103.
Livestock board; powers generally.

In addition to powers and duties hereinafter provided, the Wyoming livestock board shall:

Appoint a state veterinarian who is a graduate of a veterinary college recognized by the American Veterinary Medical Association and the Wyoming state board of veterinary medicine and licensed to practice in Wyoming and who shall serve at the pleasure of the board;

Consult with the state veterinarian when the state veterinarian appoints deputy state veterinarians. Any deputy state veterinarians shall act under the direction of the Wyoming livestock board and the state veterinarian. Deputy state veterinarians shall be graduates of a veterinary college recognized by the American Veterinary Medical Association and the Wyoming state board of veterinary medicine. Deputy state veterinarians shall serve at the pleasure of the state veterinarian. The state veterinarian shall supervise and control the action of the deputy state veterinarians and prescribe their duties and tenure of office;

Supervise and control the action of the state veterinarian and prescribe his duties and tenure of office;

Remove the state veterinarian at any time;

Promulgate and enforce rules, regulations and orders it deems necessary for the importation of domestic animals, excluding those animals covered in W.S. 23-3-301(a), recording and inspection of livestock brands, inspection, testing, brucellosis vaccination or quarantining of any livestock including brucellosis vaccination requirements for resident cattle and cattle imported into Wyoming and to develop a livestock health and emergency disease response program, including prevention, surveillance and investigation of livestock diseases through naturally occurring events or acts of agroterrorism. “Agroterrorism” for the purpose of this section means an intentional release of a biological or chemical agent that causes disease to livestock or crops or renders the food products of livestock or crops unsafe for human consumption;

Exercise the power and authority conferred upon it by this act [§§

11-18-101

through

11-18-119

], either directly or through its agency;

Designate an agency to act as its representative as provided by W.S.

11-20-201

, recorded in its minutes, and transmit the name of the agency to the auditor and treasurer of Wyoming;

Develop a comprehensive livestock health and emergency disease response program for reportable diseases as identified in W.S.

11-19-102

;

Promote the prevention, surveillance, investigation and elimination of diseases of concern and the protection of the overall health of Wyoming livestock by maintaining science based import regulations and quarantines and providing instruction to the ports of entry, veterinarians and law enforcement;

Administer the livestock law enforcement account created by W.S.

11-18-120

;

Convene when necessary for the purpose of considering the recommended closure of any elk feedground as provided under W.S. 23-1-305(a).

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 85, § 14; C.S. 1945, § 56-113; W.S. 1957, § 11-263; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-21-105; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 187, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 2006, ch. 92, § 1; 2007, ch. 191, § 1; 2009, ch. 120, § 1; 2019 ch. 182, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 97, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, rewrote (a)(ii)(A), (iii), and (iv), authorizing the position of director, giving more oversight and responsibility to a state veterinarian, who will nevertheless remain under the control of the state livestock board.

The 2007 amendment,

rewrote (a).

Laws 2007, ch. 191, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(v), added “and to develop a livestock health and emergency disease response program, including prevention, surveillance and investigation of livestock diseases through naturally occurring events or acts of agroterrorism” to the first sentence and added the second sentence; added (a)(viii) and (a)(ix); and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(x).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(xi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) and no subparagraph (a)(ii)(B) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 92, § 2, appropriates from the general fund to the livestock board two hundred twenty-one thousand five hundred dollars ($221,500.00) for the biennium to fund the director position pursuant to this act and authorizes one (1) full-time equivalent position for the position of director authorized by this act.

Laws 2009, ch. 120, § 2(a), provides as follows:

“(a)
There is appropriated one hundred sixty thousand dollars ($160,000.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming livestock board as follows:

“(i)
One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) for one (1) full-time position for a field veterinary medical officer for salary and benefits.
This position is to assist the state veterinarian in animal trace back, risk assessment, epidemiology, affected area owners and science based decisions;

“(ii) Forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000.00) for a contractor to develop a comprehensive technology plan and business analysis needed to assess and deploy a state-wide electronic system for ownership verification for the livestock brand program and the essential disease trace back and ownership for the livestock health and emergency disease response program that:

“(A) Includes integration and interfaces with new and existing databases, programs and applications;

“(B) Ensures system and data security and integrity;

“(C) Defines initial and on-going training and information technology maintenance resources; and

“(D) Is designed for user friendliness as well as accurate and efficient reporting.

“(iii) Fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00) for the vehicle, field office support and expenses for the additional positions authorized in this act.

“(b)
The appropriations under subsection (a) of this section shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, these appropriations shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from these appropriations shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Bison, Brucellosis, and Law in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1993).

§ 11-18-104.
Livestock board; oath.

Members of the Wyoming
livestock board, before entering upon their duties, shall take the
oath of office prescribed by the constitution, and file it in the
office of the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 85, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 56-102; W.S. 1957, § 11-264; W.S. 1977, § 11-21-106; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

§ 11-18-105.
Livestock
board; election of president; meetings generally.

The Wyoming livestock
board shall elect one (1) of its members president. It shall meet
at such times as called by the president, any three (3) members of
the board, the state veterinarian or the director.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 85, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 56-104; W.S. 1957, § 11-265; Laws 1973, ch. 61, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-21-107; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2007, ch. 191, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

substituted “the state veterinarian or the director” for “or the chief executive officer.”

Laws 2007, ch. 191, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

§ 11-18-106.
Livestock
board; quorum; compensation.

A majority of the board
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. Members of the
board shall receive compensation, mileage and per diem for time actually
spent in the performance of their duties and traveling expenses while
in attendance, and going to and from board meetings in the same manner
and amount as members of the Wyoming legislature.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 85, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 56-103; W.S. 1957, § 11-266; W.S. 1977, § 11-21-108; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2006, ch. 90, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to per diem and travel expenses of state employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to mileage expense, see §

9-3-103

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, substituted “mileage and per diem” for “at the rate of ten dollars ($10.00) per day,” and substituted “members of the Wyoming legislature” for “provided for state employees by W.S.

9-3-102

.”

Cited

in

Sell v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. (In re Sell), 7 P.3d 1,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 11-18-107.
Livestock board; seal.

The Wyoming livestock
board shall have a seal upon which is engraved “Wyoming Livestock
Board.”

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 85, § 15; C.S. 1945, § 56-114; W.S. 1957, § 11-267; W.S. 1977, § 11-21-109; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-18-108.
Livestock board; report to governor.

The Wyoming livestock
board shall report to the governor all proceedings and the condition
of the livestock interest of Wyoming as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 85, § 17; C.S. 1945, § 56-117; W.S. 1957, § 11-268; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-21-110; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-18-109.
Disposition of collected fees and monies in general fund; payment of expenses of board.

All fees and monies collected by the Wyoming livestock board or any of its officers, agents or employees, not specifically required by law to be credited to a different fund, shall be placed by the board in the general fund with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer.

The expenses incurred in the conduct of the business of the Wyoming livestock board, the state veterinarian and the director, including the per diem of members of the board, the salaries or wages of the director, deputy state veterinarians and other necessary employees, traveling expenses, furnishing of offices, stationery, supplies and all other expenditures necessary and incident thereto, shall be paid out of the general fund appropriations provided by law. All expenses shall be itemized on the proper vouchers, approved by the director, covered by proper receipts, and paid by the state auditor from money appropriated by law.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 85, § 16; 1935, ch. 39, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 56-116; W.S. 1957, § 11-269; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 2; 1973, ch. 11, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 11-21-111; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2007, ch. 191, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

in (b), substituted variants of “director” for “chief executive officer” three times and inserted “the state veterinarian.”

Laws 2007, ch. 191, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “board in the general fund with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer” for “state treasurer in the general fund” in (a); and substituted “auditor” for “treasurer” in the last sentence.

§ 11-18-110.
Director;
deputy directors; term; powers and duties generally; orders subject
to review.

The board shall appoint a director, who shall be the chief executive officer of the board. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the board and act as the secretary of the Wyoming livestock board, subject to the rules and regulations of the board. He may act for and perform the duties imposed by law upon the board when the board is not in session, but an order or regulation made by him is subject to review, modification or annulment by the board at any subsequent meeting.

The director may appoint deputy directors for agency divisions. The deputy directors shall serve at the pleasure of the director and are responsible to and under the control and supervision of the director.

The director shall supervise and control the action of the other employees and prescribe their duties and tenure of office.

Unless otherwise specified in this chapter, the director may only remove employees in accordance with personnel rules of the state executive branch.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 85, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 56-106; W.S. 1957, § 11-272; W.S. 1977, § 11-21-114; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2006, ch. 92, § 1; 2007, ch. 191, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, rewrote the first sentence in (a), making the director serve at the pleasure of the chief executive officer, and added (b) through (d).

The 2007 amendment,

in (a), added the first sentence, and substituted “board” for “chief executive officer” in the second sentence.

Laws 2007, ch. 191, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 92, § 2 appropriates from the general fund to the livestock board two hundred twenty-one thousand five hundred dollars ($221,500.00) for the biennium to fund the director position pursuant to this act and authorizes one (1) full-time equivalent position for the position of director authorized by this act.

§ 11-18-111.
Deputy state veterinarians; appointment; powers and duties; term.

With the consent of the
Wyoming livestock board and approval of either the federal veterinarian
in charge of Wyoming or the chief of veterinary services, United States
department of agriculture, the state veterinarian may appoint federal
veterinary inspectors stationed in this state as deputy state veterinarians,
and federal lay inspectors stationed in this state may be appointed
agents of the Wyoming livestock board. All federal officers appointed
as deputies or agents of the Wyoming livestock board shall possess
the powers and duties of deputy state veterinarians or agents of the
Wyoming livestock board, but they shall act without compensation and
hold office only at the pleasure of the state veterinarian.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 85, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 56-109; W.S. 1957, § 11-274; W.S. 1977, § 11-21-115; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-18-112.
Authority of federal authorities and state inspectors to call sheriffs
for assistance; failure to comply; penalties.

All federal authorities
authorized, and the various inspectors of this state, may call upon
any sheriff or peace officer in any county in this state to assist
them in the discharge of their duties and those peace officers shall
assist them when so requested. The federal inspector has the same
power to enforce the laws of this state as the various inspectors
of the state when authorized as aforesaid and engaged in the discharge
of their official duties. Any person refusing to comply with the orders
of such officer or federal inspector shall be punished as provided
in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 60, § 23; C.S. 1910, § 2704; C.S. 1920, § 3213; R.S. 1931, § 67-1423; C.S. 1945, § 56-416; W.S. 1957, § 11-464; W.S. 1977, § 11-27-117; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2.

Applied

in

Hoblyn v. Johnson, 2002 WY 152, 55 P.3d 1219,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 11-18-113.
When state veterinarian authorized to enter premises or vehicle to
inspect livestock.

In the performance of
their official duties, the state veterinarian or any agent or officer
of the Wyoming livestock board may enter any place or vehicle used
for the treatment, retention or transportation of livestock, including
poultry, or where he has reason to believe any livestock affected
with or exposed to infectious, contagious or communicable diseases
may be found.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 85, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 56-110; W.S. 1957, § 11-275; W.S. 1977, § 11-21-116; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 18, ch. 85, Laws 1933, repealed certain designated sections of R.S. 1931.

§§ 11-18-114 through 11-18-116.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1978, ch. 47, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Sections

11-18-114

through 11-18-116, which derived from Laws 1947, ch. 33, §§ 1 through 3, relating to the state veterinary laboratory, formerly appeared as §§ 11-21-117 to 11-21-119 prior to revision of title 11 by § 1, ch. 32, Laws 1978, and §§ 11-21-117 to 11-21-119 were repealed by § 2, ch. 47, Laws 1978. For present similar provisions, see §

21-17-308

.

§ 11-18-117.
Confidentiality
of livestock premises and identification records; penalties.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, all records, data and information collected by the state, recorded or otherwise, for the purposes of a livestock identification program shall be confidential and are not public records for purposes of W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

. The records, data and information shall be released only upon order of the Wyoming livestock board to appropriate governmental agencies for the purposes of a livestock identification program, disease outbreak or law enforcement investigation. The board shall not release any records, data or information to a federal agency until the agency confirms in writing that it will maintain the records, data and information as confidential and that they are not subject to the federal Freedom of Information Act, 5 U.S.C. § 552, as amended. Upon release by the board of any information to any other governmental entity, the board shall notify the person to whom the information refers or pertains that the release has been made, the name of the entity to whom the information was released and shall provide a copy or summary of the information contained in the release. The records, data and information shall not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action.

The Wyoming livestock board may release information collected for the purposes of a livestock identification program related to the ownership and location of individual animals to the extent the information is useful in controlling or preventing a disease outbreak or to show particular animals or herds are not involved in a disease outbreak. The information released may be a public release or may be limited to specific individuals with a need to know the information, as the livestock board deems the circumstances require.

For the purposes of animal disease traceability, Wyoming livestock owners may choose to identify animals using any methods set forth in 9 C.F.R. part 86, as adopted on January 9, 2013, as well as any additional methods that are later approved by the Wyoming livestock board as “official identification”.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or amend the brucellosis surveillance or testing program administered by the state.

A person who knowingly provides false information to the Wyoming livestock board for purposes of a livestock identification program shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for up to six (6) months, or both.

A person who refuses to provide to the livestock board information that is required under the authority of the livestock board for purposes of a mandatory livestock identification program shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for up to six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 107, § 1; 2021 ch. 111, § 1, effective April 6, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

deleted "national" preceding "livestock" throughout the section; added (c) and (d); and redesignated former (c) and (d) as (e) and (f).

Laws 2021, ch. 111, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 107, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 11-18-118.
Conducting
business electronically.

The Wyoming livestock
board may allow its business to be conducted electronically as provided
by the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 90, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 90, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 11-18-119.
Veterinarian
loan repayment program; rulemaking authority.

The board is authorized to enter into agreements with graduate veterinarians who are licensed to practice in the state of Wyoming, to provide food animal health care in this state. For purposes of this section, “food animal” means cattle, swine, sheep or goats. The agreements shall:

Provide for the veterinarian to practice food animal veterinary medicine in a community of the state from among a list of communities developed by the board. A veterinarian shall agree to provide food animal veterinary care for the period of the contract in underserved areas of the state;

Provide that the veterinarian shall be repaid up to one hundred percent (100%) of the total amount of outstanding educational loans the veterinarian has acquired as a direct result of undergraduate or postgraduate educational training directly related to providing food animal veterinary services, not to exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) per year, including the matching funds specified in subsection (d) of this section, in exchange for practicing his profession under the terms of this section;

Require the veterinarian to practice food animal veterinary services for a minimum of three (3) years under the agreement;

Contain other provisions the board deems necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this section.

The board, in consultation with the appropriate licensing board and professional association, shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. In carrying out this section the board shall assess food animal veterinary care needs of the state by geographic areas and shall prioritize and enter into agreements under this section accordingly.

The board may vary the terms of each agreement in accordance with this section based upon the community and the food animal veterinary needs of the state.

No state money shall be expended for repayment of any loan under this section unless twenty-five percent (25%) of the money is matched with other funds in any combination from any county, city, veterinary clinic, animal care facility, state agency, university, laboratory or veterinary association.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 118, § 1; 2010, ch. 2, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), inserted “graduate” and substituted “are licensed to practice in the state of Wyoming” for “have graduated from accredited veterinary colleges.”

Laws 2010, ch. 2 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2010.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2008, ch. 118, § 2, provides: “There is appropriated two hundred seventy thousand dollars ($270,000.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming livestock board.
This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of providing for loan repayments pursuant to W.S. 11 18 119.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. Any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure as provided by this act.
A request for this appropriation amount shall be included in the Wyoming livestock board 2011-2012 exception biennial budget request.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2008, ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 11-18-120.
Livestock law enforcement account; reimbursement of county sheriffs by livestock board; rules.

There is created the livestock law enforcement account. Unexpended, unobligated funds in the account shall revert to the general fund at the end of a biennium. Unless otherwise provided by law, the balance in the account shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00).

Funds in the livestock law enforcement account shall only be expended by the livestock board to:

Reimburse county sheriffs for activities relating to in-state and out-of-state livestock investigations;

Provide training to county sheriffs regarding livestock enforcement.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, reimbursement provided under paragraph (b)(i) of this section shall be credited to the applicable account, fund, subaccount or other accounting unit within the budget of a county which is controlled by the county sheriff. Reimbursement provided under paragraph (b)(i) of this section shall not be withheld by a board of county commissioners from a county sheriff or deducted from the budget of a county sheriff.

The livestock board shall adopt rules to implement this section, which shall include eligible expenses, rates and procedures for reimbursement.

History.

2019 ch. 182, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 182, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.